Utah statutes.
13-37-202.   Disclosure of nonpublic personal information prohibited without notice.

(1)  A commercial entity may not disclose nonpublic personal information that the commercial entity obtained on or after January 1, 2004, as a result of a consumer transaction if the commercial entity fails to comply with Section 13-37-201.

(2)  This chapter may not be interpreted as authorizing a commercial entity to disclose nonpublic personal information to a greater extent than the  commercial entity is otherwise permitted to disclose nonpublic personal information.



Enacted by Chapter 97, 2003 General Session

